eng/eng_verbs_regular.lexc
! eng_Verbs_Regular.lexc !
!
! (C) 2015-2016 by Damir Cavar <damir.cavar@gmail.com>, Anthony Meyer <>
!
! DO NOT EDIT!
! This is an automatically generated file!

Multichar_Symbols +V +N +P +Adj +Adv +Pron +Aux +Art +Dem +Refl +PretPres +Q +Neg +Sg +Pl +Pos +Fem +Masc +Neut +Aux +Art +Def +Indef +Pres +PastPart +Past +PresPart +1P +2P +3P +Acc +Nom +Dat +Countable +Uncountable +Mass +Arch +NECountry +NEPersonName +NEFamilyName +NELanguage +Intens +Emph +Countable +Uncountable +Mass +Comparative +Superlative +Poet +Formal +Dialect +Abbrev +Time +Temporal +Manner +Place +Law +NEProfession 

LEXICON VRinf
+V:0 #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
+V+Past:^ed #;
+V+PastPart:^ed #;

LEXICON Root
absorb VRinf;
accede VRinf;
accommodate VRinf;
account VRinf;
achieve VRinf;
acquire VRinf;
adapt VRinf;
adhere VRinf;
admire VRinf;
adorn VRinf;
advise VRinf;
affirm VRinf;
agglomerate VRinf;
aid VRinf;
alienate VRinf;
alleviate VRinf;
alter VRinf;
ambush VRinf;
amplify VRinf;
angle VRinf;
annoy VRinf;
anticipate VRinf;
appear VRinf;
appoint VRinf;
apprehend VRinf;
approximate VRinf;
arm VRinf;
arrive VRinf;
ascertain VRinf;
assail VRinf;
assign VRinf;
assume VRinf;
attach VRinf;
attend VRinf;
audition VRinf;
automate VRinf;
average VRinf;
awaken VRinf;
baffle VRinf;
ban VRinf;
bankrupt VRinf;
barge VRinf;
barricade VRinf;
battle VRinf;
beg VRinf;
believe VRinf;
benefit VRinf;
bestow VRinf;
bevel VRinf;
black VRinf;
blaze VRinf;
blind VRinf;
bloom VRinf;
blunt VRinf;
boast VRinf;
bolt VRinf;
book VRinf;
borrow VRinf;
bow VRinf;
brag VRinf;
bread VRinf;
bridge VRinf;
broil VRinf;
bubble VRinf;
budget VRinf;
bully VRinf;
bunt VRinf;
burrow VRinf;
buzz VRinf;
calculate VRinf;
camp VRinf;
canoe VRinf;
capture VRinf;
carry VRinf;
case VRinf;
categorize VRinf;
caution VRinf;
cement VRinf;
cf. VRinf;
champion VRinf;
channel VRinf;
charge VRinf;
chat VRinf;
cheer VRinf;
chicken VRinf;
chop VRinf;
cipher VRinf;
claim VRinf;
class VRinf;
clear VRinf;
climb VRinf;
clog VRinf;
clutch VRinf;
coax VRinf;
cohere VRinf;
collaborate VRinf;
color VRinf;
combat VRinf;
comfort VRinf;
commend VRinf;
commune VRinf;
compare VRinf;
compete VRinf;
complete VRinf;
compose VRinf;
comprise VRinf;
concede VRinf;
conciliate VRinf;
condense VRinf;
confess VRinf;
conflict VRinf;
congratulate VRinf;
connote VRinf;
consider VRinf;
conspire VRinf;
consult VRinf;
contaminate VRinf;
contest VRinf;
contrast VRinf;
converge VRinf;
convict VRinf;
cooperate VRinf;
cope VRinf;
correct VRinf;
corrode VRinf;
counsel VRinf;
counterattack VRinf;
court VRinf;
crane VRinf;
create VRinf;
crochet VRinf;
crown VRinf;
crystallize VRinf;
cup VRinf;
curse VRinf;
custom-make VRinf;
damn VRinf;
dare VRinf;
daunt VRinf;
decay VRinf;
decide VRinf;
decompose VRinf;
deduce VRinf;
deepen VRinf;
define VRinf;
defy VRinf;
delay VRinf;
deliver VRinf;
democratize VRinf;
denote VRinf;
depend VRinf;
depose VRinf;
derive VRinf;
desert VRinf;
desire VRinf;
destroy VRinf;
detect VRinf;
detest VRinf;
develop VRinf;
devour VRinf;
die VRinf;
dignify VRinf;
diminish VRinf;
disable VRinf;
disappear VRinf;
disbelieve VRinf;
discipline VRinf;
discorporate VRinf;
discover VRinf;
disengage VRinf;
disintegrate VRinf;
disown VRinf;
dispense VRinf;
dispose VRinf;
disrobe VRinf;
dissolve VRinf;
distort VRinf;
disturb VRinf;
divorce VRinf;
dog VRinf;
dot VRinf;
dovetail VRinf;
drag VRinf;
draw-file VRinf;
drill VRinf;
drown VRinf;
duck VRinf;
dust VRinf;
ease VRinf;
edge VRinf;
effecte VRinf;
elaborate VRinf;
eliminate VRinf;
embezzle VRinf;
emit VRinf;
empty VRinf;
encamp VRinf;
encounter VRinf;
endanger VRinf;
endure VRinf;
enhance VRinf;
enlighten VRinf;
enslave VRinf;
enter VRinf;
entrust VRinf;
epitomize VRinf;
equip VRinf;
err VRinf;
escort VRinf;
evacuate VRinf;
even VRinf;
evolve VRinf;
exasperate VRinf;
exchange VRinf;
excoriate VRinf;
exempt VRinf;
exhibit VRinf;
expand VRinf;
experience VRinf;
explode VRinf;
expose VRinf;
extend VRinf;
extract VRinf;
face VRinf;
fake VRinf;
fancy VRinf;
fasten VRinf;
favor VRinf;
feather VRinf;
fell VRinf;
fete VRinf;
figger VRinf;
film VRinf;
finger-paint VRinf;
fix VRinf;
flap VRinf;
flex VRinf;
flng VRinf;
flood VRinf;
flower VRinf;
focus VRinf;
fool VRinf;
forgit VRinf;
formalize VRinf;
foster VRinf;
frame VRinf;
fret VRinf;
fry VRinf;
function VRinf;
fuss VRinf;
game VRinf;
garner VRinf;
gay-ess VRinf;
gentle VRinf;
glance VRinf;
glean VRinf;
glorify VRinf;
gouge VRinf;
grant VRinf;
gratify VRinf;
greet VRinf;
grip VRinf;
ground VRinf;
grunt VRinf;
guide VRinf;
hail VRinf;
hand VRinf;
harass VRinf;
harry VRinf;
hate VRinf;
head VRinf;
heat VRinf;
herd VRinf;
hike VRinf;
hole VRinf;
honor VRinf;
hope VRinf;
hug VRinf;
humor VRinf;
hurl VRinf;
identify VRinf;
ignore VRinf;
imagine VRinf;
impart VRinf;
implore VRinf;
impress VRinf;
impute VRinf;
incite VRinf;
incur VRinf;
indulge VRinf;
inflame VRinf;
inform VRinf;
inhibit VRinf;
innovate VRinf;
inspect VRinf;
institute VRinf;
insure VRinf;
interact VRinf;
interfere VRinf;
intersect VRinf;
introduce VRinf;
invalidate VRinf;
invert VRinf;
invoke VRinf;
irrigate VRinf;
itch VRinf;
jerk VRinf;
jolt VRinf;
juggle VRinf;
keel VRinf;
kid VRinf;
kneel VRinf;
knot VRinf;
lacerate VRinf;
land VRinf;
lasso VRinf;
launch VRinf;
lecture VRinf;
level VRinf;
lick VRinf;
like VRinf;
linger VRinf;
live VRinf;
locate VRinf;
look VRinf;
loosen VRinf;
lower VRinf;
lunge VRinf;
maintain VRinf;
manage VRinf;
manufacture VRinf;
mark VRinf;
mask VRinf;
massage VRinf;
materialize VRinf;
maximize VRinf;
meld VRinf;
mend VRinf;
mesh VRinf;
milk VRinf;
mingle VRinf;
miss VRinf;
mix VRinf;
model VRinf;
mold VRinf;
moon VRinf;
motivate VRinf;
mourn VRinf;
multiply VRinf;
mustard VRinf;
nail VRinf;
near VRinf;
negate VRinf;
neutralize VRinf;
nolle VRinf;
note VRinf;
nullify VRinf;
object VRinf;
obstruct VRinf;
occur VRinf;
omit VRinf;
oppose VRinf;
order VRinf;
oust VRinf;
outgrip VRinf;
outweigh VRinf;
overexpose VRinf;
overheat VRinf;
over-produce VRinf;
owe VRinf;
pack VRinf;
page VRinf;
pamper VRinf;
parade VRinf;
pare VRinf;
participate VRinf;
pat VRinf;
pause VRinf;
pedal VRinf;
peer VRinf;
perch VRinf;
permeate VRinf;
persist VRinf;
petition VRinf;
pick VRinf;
pillage VRinf;
pine VRinf;
pit VRinf;
plague VRinf;
plant VRinf;
plod VRinf;
plug VRinf;
point VRinf;
polish VRinf;
populate VRinf;
possess VRinf;
pound VRinf;
practise VRinf;
preach VRinf;
prefer VRinf;
presage VRinf;
preside VRinf;
presuppose VRinf;
prevayle VRinf;
pride VRinf;
proceed VRinf;
procure VRinf;
profit VRinf;
project VRinf;
prompt VRinf;
propel VRinf;
proscribe VRinf;
protect VRinf;
provoke VRinf;
puff VRinf;
punch VRinf;
purge VRinf;
push VRinf;
pyramid VRinf;
quell VRinf;
quibble VRinf;
quote VRinf;
radio VRinf;
rake VRinf;
range VRinf;
ratify VRinf;
re-activate VRinf;
reaffirm VRinf;
reappear VRinf;
reassemble VRinf;
reawaken VRinf;
rebut VRinf;
receave VRinf;
recheck VRinf;
reclaim VRinf;
recollect VRinf;
reconsider VRinf;
recover VRinf;
rededicate VRinf;
redress VRinf;
re-emphasise VRinf;
re-establish VRinf;
re-explore VRinf;
refinance VRinf;
refrain VRinf;
refute VRinf;
regret VRinf;
reign VRinf;
reinterpret VRinf;
rejoin VRinf;
relieve VRinf;
rely VRinf;
remedy VRinf;
remove VRinf;
reopen VRinf;
repeat VRinf;
replenish VRinf;
repress VRinf;
request VRinf;
resemble VRinf;
reside VRinf;
resort VRinf;
restock VRinf;
result VRinf;
retaliate VRinf;
retort VRinf;
return VRinf;
revel VRinf;
review VRinf;
revolve VRinf;
riffle VRinf;
ripple VRinf;
roar VRinf;
role-experiment VRinf;
root VRinf;
round VRinf;
rub VRinf;
rust VRinf;
saddle VRinf;
salivate VRinf;
sanction VRinf;
saute VRinf;
scald VRinf;
scarify VRinf;
scold VRinf;
scour VRinf;
scream VRinf;
scribe VRinf;
seal VRinf;
secede VRinf;
seep VRinf;
selle VRinf;
serve VRinf;
shade VRinf;
share VRinf;
shelter VRinf;
shim VRinf;
shock VRinf;
shoulder VRinf;
shred VRinf;
shuffle VRinf;
shy VRinf;
sight VRinf;
silence VRinf;
sin VRinf;
size VRinf;
ski VRinf;
skulk VRinf;
slice VRinf;
slug VRinf;
smooth VRinf;
snore VRinf;
solace VRinf;
sour VRinf;
spear VRinf;
spill VRinf;
spray VRinf;
squat VRinf;
stagger VRinf;
starve VRinf;
sticle VRinf;
stooooomp VRinf;
strap VRinf;
stroke VRinf;
subject VRinf;
subsist VRinf;
suffer VRinf;
summon VRinf;
supplement VRinf;
surmount VRinf;
suspend VRinf;
swivel VRinf;
tack-solder VRinf;
tap VRinf;
tat VRinf;
telegraph VRinf;
terrify VRinf;
thinke VRinf;
thunder VRinf;
till VRinf;
toe VRinf;
tote VRinf;
train VRinf;
translate VRinf;
treat VRinf;
trouble VRinf;
tumble VRinf;
tyrannize VRinf;
undress VRinf;
unleash VRinf;
unsheathe VRinf;
urge VRinf;
vacation VRinf;
verify VRinf;
visualize VRinf;
wail VRinf;
war VRinf;
wave VRinf;
weld VRinf;
whistle VRinf;
wipe VRinf;
woo VRinf;
wreck VRinf;
yawn VRinf;
